Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
State Purchasing

45.360.
Finance and Administration Cabinet — Powers and duties. [Repealed.]

45.365.
Central purchasing. [Repealed.]

45.370.
Standards and specifications fixed by regulations. [Repealed.]

45.380.
Inspection and quality control — Regulations, checks, testing. [Repealed.]

45.390.
List of bidders — When sealed bids required — Time for invitations to bid. [Repealed.]

45.395.
Fair trade law not applicable to state purchases. [Repealed.]

45.400.
Emergency purchases, procedure. [Repealed.]

45.410.
Purchases under fifty dollars — Petty cash account. [Repealed.]

45.420.
Imprest cash funds — Establishment — Replenishment. [Repealed.]

45.430.
Waiver of law on purchases from government. [Repealed.]

45.450.
Purchase price to be set out in bill of sale or deed.

Where title to any property or any interest therein is transferred, for monetary or other consideration, by or to the Commonwealth of Kentucky by deed, bill of sale, or otherwise, the purchase price or other consideration shall be set out in full on the face of the deed, bill of sale, or other instrument.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 110, § 1.

45.451.
Policy.

It is the policy of the Commonwealth that all bills shall be paid on time.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 61, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

45.452.
Definition of “purchasing agency.”

A “purchasing agency” is any state organizational unit or administrative body as defined in KRS

12.010

that actually receives goods or services from a vendor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 61, § 2, effective January 1, 1985.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Under the literal wording of KRS

12.010

and

12.020

and this section, the 30-day payment rule established in KRS

45.453

applies to the Corrections Cabinet’s payment to the counties of the reimbursement fees occasioned by the detention of convicted felons in county jails, pursuant to KRS

431.215

; the invoices submitted by such affected counties must be consistent with KRS

431.215

(2).

OAG 84-357

.

45.453.
Time period for payment.

All bills shall be paid within thirty (30) working days of receipt of goods and services or a vendor’s invoice except when the purchasing agency has transmitted a rejection notice to the vendor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 61, § 3, effective January 1, 1985; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 21, effective May 30, 1997.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Under the literal wording of KRS

12.010

,

12.020

and

45.452

, the 30-day payment rule established in this section applies to the Corrections Cabinet’s payment to the counties of the reimbursement fees occasioned by the detention of convicted felons in county jails, pursuant to KRS

431.215

; the invoices submitted by such affected counties must be consistent with KRS

431.215

(2).

OAG 84-357

.

45.454.
Penalty for late payment.

An interest penalty of one percent (1%) of any amount approved and unpaid shall be added to the amount approved for each month or fraction thereof after the thirty (30) working days which followed receipt of the goods or services or vendor’s invoice by a purchasing agency.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 61, § 4, effective January 1, 1985; 1998, ch. 118, § 18, effective July 15, 1998.

45.455.
Transmission of authorization for payment to Finance and Administration Cabinet.

A purchasing agency shall transmit authorization for payment documentation to the Finance and Administration Cabinet within ten (10) working days of receipt of goods or services or the vendor’s invoice by the purchasing agency.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 61, § 5, effective January 1, 1985; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 22, effective May 30, 1997.

45.456.
Warrant for payment.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall transmit a warrant for payment to the State Treasurer within ten (10) working days of receipt of the authorization for payment documentation from the purchasing agency. When the Finance and Administration Cabinet is the purchasing agency, the cabinet shall transmit a warrant for payment to the State Treasurer within twenty (20) working days of receipt of the authorization for payment documentation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 61, § 6, effective January 1, 1985; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 23, effective May 30, 1997.

45.457.
Check for payment.

The State Treasurer shall transmit to the purchasing agency or vendor a check for payment to a vendor within five (5) working days of receipt of a warrant for payment from the Finance and Administration Cabinet. The purchasing agency shall transmit the check for payment to a vendor within five (5) working days of receipt of the check from the State Treasurer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 61, § 7, effective January 1, 1985; 1998, ch. 120, § 8, effective July 15, 1998.

45.458.
Payment of interest penalty.

The interest penalty imposed by KRS

45.454

shall be paid from moneys already appropriated to the operating budget of the agency whose violation of KRS

45.455

,

45.456

or

45.457

caused the violation of KRS

45.453

. No agency shall budget money for the purpose of paying interest penalties. If the violation of KRS

45.453

is caused by two (2) or more agencies, including the Department of the Treasury and the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the cost of the penalty shall be prorated among the agencies on the basis of the number of days that each agency violated KRS

45.451

to

45.458

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 61, § 8, effective January 1, 1985.

45.460.
Collusion to restrain bids prohibited. [Repealed and reenacted.]